src/noun-ipk-lex.txt
! ============== !
! Nouminal roots !
! ============== !

! stems according to Edna MacLean


! ==================================== !
! Proper nouns, pronouns and particles !
! ==================================== !

! These lexica are stored here for convenience at the moment.
! They should be moved to separate files when the project is
! scaled up to full size.

LEXICON prop
Nayuk propmorph ;

LEXICON pron
suna pronmorph ; ! what
kiña:keña pronmorph ; ! who
una pronmorph ; ! =KAL

LEXICON part
aaqagu partmorph ; ! wait a minute
atakhii:atakhee partmorph ; ! look at that
ii:ee partmorph ; ! yes
naagga partmorph ; ! no
naumi partmorph ; ! no
qakugulu partmorph ; ! until next time



! ================ !
! The noun lexicon !
! ================ !

! Tronds additions marked !tt, remove !tt tag when the contlex is checked.
